Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 4. Public Utilities

§ 3781.
Tapping gas pipes with intent to defraud.

A person who taps gas pipes with intent to take gas therefrom, or who connects pipes with such gas pipes so that gas may be used without passing through the meters for measurement, or who knowingly burns gas without measurement by gas meters, without the consent of the owner, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $100.00, or both.
The owner of the gas may recover of the person so unlawfully tapping or connecting such pipes or using gas, the actual damages, with costs, in a civil action on this statute.

§ 3782.
Tapping electric lines; injuries to electric plants.

A person who willfully commits or causes to be committed an act with intent to injure a machine, apparatus, or structure appertaining to the works of a person, firm, association, or corporation engaged in manufacturing, selling, or distributing electrical energy in this State, or whereby such works may be stopped, obstructed, or injured, or who taps an electrical line of a person, firm, association, or corporation so that electricity can be taken therefrom, or knowingly uses electricity taken from such line without the consent of such person, firm, association, or corporation, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $300.00, or both. Such person shall also be liable to such person, firm, association, or corporation or to anyone injured for actual damages, with full costs, in a civil action on this statute.

§ 3783.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 3784.
Interfering with meters.

A person, other than an authorized agent or employee acting for the owner, manufacturer, or operator thereof, who maliciously opens, closes, breaks into, or in any manner adjusts or interferes with a meter, or other regulating or measuring device or appliance attached to or connected with wires, pipe lines, mains, service pipes, or house pipes owned or used by a manufacturer or furnisher of electricity, gas, or water shall be imprisoned not more than three months or fined not more than
$100.00, or both.

§ 3785.
Injuring lights in streets and public buildings.

A person who willfully and maliciously breaks the glass about a street lamp or gaslight, or a lamp or gaslight in the grounds about a public building, or, without authority, lights such a lamp or gaslight or extinguishes the same when lighted, or in any manner interferes therewith, or injures any part of the fixtures supporting such lamp or gaslight, or defaces the same by painting or posting notices thereon, or fastens a horse or animal thereto, shall be imprisoned not more than three months or fined not more than $50.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1981, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 3786.
Tapping cable television systems; damage to equipment.

A person who willfully or maliciously damages, or causes to be damaged, any wire, cable, conduit, apparatus, or equipment of a company operating a cable television system, as defined in 30 V.S.A. § 501, or who commits any act with intent to cause damage to any wire, cable, conduit, apparatus, or equipment of a company operating such a system, or who taps, tampers with, or connects any wire or device to the equipment of the cable television company that would degrade the service rendered without authorization of the company may be fined not more than $100.00 and shall be liable in a civil action for three times the actual amount of damages sustained thereby.

HISTORY:

Added 1971, No. 202 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 1972.